Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 7

County Buildings and Property

5-7-101. County powers generally.

Each county may acquire and hold property for county purposes, and make all contracts necessary or expedient for the management, control and improvement thereof, and for the better exercise of its civil and political powers, and may make any order for the disposition of its property.

Code 1858, § 404; Shan., § 496; mod. Code 1932, § 742; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-701.

Cross-References. Airports and landing fields, acquisition authorized, title 42, ch. 5, part 1.

Asylums for the poor, title 71, ch. 5, part 21.

Detention places for persons under quarantine, § 68-10-108.

Exemption of county property from taxation, § 67-5-203.

Forestry purposes, acquisition of lands, § 11-23-101.

Industrial Building Bond Act of 1955, title 7, ch. 55.

Industrial development corporations, title 7, ch. 53.

Lease of buildings and facilities authorized, title 12, ch. 2, part 3.

Power to erect and control county buildings, § 5-5-121.

Recreation systems, title 11, ch. 24.

Transportation systems, ownership authorized, title 7, ch. 56, part 1.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Veterans' memorials, title 58, ch. 4, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. County hospital board of trustees' authority to sell hospital, OAG 98-0119, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (7/2/98).

Authorization of the county commission is required for the sale of property of the county board of hospital directors; unless the county has adopted the County Purchasing Law of 1957, T.C.A. §§ 5-14-101, et seq., or the County Financial Management System of 1981, T.C.A. §§ 5-21-101, et seq., the commission may authorize the purchasing and finance commission to sell the property without advertising for bids, OAG 03-131, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 149 (10/03/03).

5-7-102. Grants for use of county.

All deeds, conveyances or grants that have been, or may be, made to any officer or person for the use or benefit of the county, vest in such county the title as fully as if made to such county by name, but such conveyances hereafter shall be made to the county.

Code 1858, § 407 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 34, § 5); Shan., § 499; Code 1932, § 745; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-702.

5-7-103. Sites for offices.

The county legislative body of every county, a majority of the members being present and voting for it, may purchase and hold suitable sites for offices of the county clerks, and such other county offices as may be deemed expedient by the legislative body.

Code 1858, § 409 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 3, § 1); Shan., § 501; Code 1932, § 753; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-703.

5-7-104. Required structures.

It is the duty of the county legislative body to erect a courthouse, jail, and other necessary county buildings.

Code 1858, § 408; Shan., § 500; Code 1932, § 752; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-704.

Attorney General Opinions. County legislative bodies' responsibility to provide court facilities, OAG 99-049, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (3/2/99).

5-7-105. Location of county buildings and courthouse, jail, workhouse and county highway department garage — Interlocal agreements.

The courthouse and all county buildings provided by the county for the county officers shall be erected within the limits of the county town; provided, that the jail and county highway department garage may be erected outside the limits of the county town but within the boundaries of the county; and provided further, that if two (2) or more counties enter into an interlocal agreement providing for a jail or workhouse to serve the counties that are parties to the agreement, then a county that is a party to such an agreement shall not be required to have a jail or workhouse located within the boundaries of the county, but any jail or workhouse serving more than one (1) county shall be located within the boundaries of one (1) of the counties that is a party to the agreement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing or prohibiting a county that has constructed a criminal justice building or facility, or that uses a building or facility, that is not located within the limits of the county seat, from holding criminal court in that building or facility; provided, that it is located within the limits of the county. If the building or facility is used to hold criminal court, a defendant may be indicted, prosecuted, tried and convicted in that building or facility as if done at the courthouse.

Code 1858, § 410; Shan., § 502; Code 1932, § 754; Acts 1975, ch. 10, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-705; Acts 1980, ch. 853, § 1; 1982, ch. 782, § 1; 1990, ch. 955, § 1; 1992, ch. 847, § 1; 1995, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 190, § 1; 2006, ch. 630, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Location of county buildings outside city limits of county seat town, OAG 03-060, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (5/06/03).

Unless expressly authorized by T.C.A. §§ 16-2-106 through 16-2-402 [partially repealed] or a private act, neither a general sessions nor a circuit court may regularly hold its sessions outside the city limits of the county seat, OAG 05-122 (8/8/05).

5-7-106. Construction and maintenance costs — Tax levy.

The county buildings are to be erected and kept in order and repair at the expense of the county, under the direction of the county legislative body, and it may levy a special tax for this purpose.

Code 1858, § 411; Shan., § 503; Code 1932, § 755; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-706.

5-7-107. Employment of superintendent.

The county legislative body is authorized, but not required, to employ a competent person to superintend the construction and repair of such county buildings, bridges, levees, etc., as may be necessary; the superintendent to be paid such salary as may be agreed upon, out of the county treasury, but no contract to continue longer than twelve (12) months.

Acts 1877, ch. 105, § 1; Shan., § 6048; Code 1932, § 10253; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-707.

5-7-108. Courthouse — Sheriff's power and duties.

The sheriff has charge of the courthouse, unless some other person is specially appointed by the county legislative body for that purpose, and shall prevent trespasses, exclude intruders, and keep it and the grounds attached thereto in order, reporting from time to time the repairs required, and the expense, to the county legislative body.

Beginning July 1, 2008, deputy sheriffs newly assigned to courts pursuant to §§ 8-8-201(a)(2)(A), 16-15-715, and 37-1-213 shall participate in forty (40) hours of basic training in courthouse security within twelve (12) months of assignment to that duty. Every year thereafter the deputies shall participate in a minimum of sixteen (16) hours of training specific to courthouse security that has been approved by the peace officers standards and training commission.

It is further the duty of the sheriff to see that the state and national flags as provided for in § 5-7-109 are properly displayed in each courtroom while such county legislative body is in session.

Code 1858, § 413; Shan., § 505; Code 1932, § 757; Acts 1961, ch. 244, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-708; Acts 2008, ch. 1152, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.32.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Courthouse security, OAG 97-117, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 150 (9/02/97).

Although T.C.A. § 16-2-505(d)(2) does not expressly authorize the court security committee to adopt any measures with regard to courthouse security, it is reasonable to infer that the committee may put into effect security measures affecting the security of space and facilities provided to state trial judges, so long as these measures do not require county expenditures; these measures may affect general sessions courtrooms and personnel, as well as the personnel of other offices located in the courthouse, if the measures are reasonably related to ensuring security of space and facilities provided to state trial judges, OAG 02-052, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (4/24/02).

County security officers employed as campus, housing, airport and other local security officers, are required to be certified under T.C.A. § 5-7-118, OAG 03-095, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (7/28/03).

Appointment of court officer authorized to carry weapon in courtrooms; required training, qualifications, etc. OAG 10-77, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 83 (6/1/10).

POST certification of bailiffs and court officers. OAG 10-107, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (10/28/10).

County courthouse security and dress rules. OAG 12-107, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (11/26/12).

5-7-109. Flags.

Any county mayor of any county whose courthouse is equipped with a flag pole shall have the right to request and be furnished with a flag of the state of Tennessee, which flag shall be displayed by the county authority upon proper occasions.

Any county mayor desiring such state flag shall certify in such county mayor's official capacity that:

The courthouse of the county of which that person is county mayor is duly equipped with a flag pole suitable for displaying such state flag; and

If such state flag is furnished such county, the county authorities agree and obligate themselves to display the same upon all national and state holidays and other days set apart by law for patriotic purposes.

Such request shall be forwarded to the adjutant general of the state, who shall thereupon furnish the county with such state flag, to be approximately six feet (6') in length and four feet (4') in width, and from the funds appropriated for the adjutant general's department, the adjutant general is authorized to procure as many state flags as may be necessary; provided, that not more than one (1) such state flag shall be furnished to any county; provided further, that no county shall be entitled to receive a second flag where the one originally furnished it has been destroyed by the elements or other casualties.

It is the duty of the county mayor of each and every county obtaining a state flag under this section to see that the same is displayed upon all legal holidays, either state or national, and upon all other days set apart for patriotic observance.

Every county shall provide a flag of the United States and a flag of the state of Tennessee to be displayed in the courtroom of every court of record of the county while such court is in session.

Acts 1937 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 102.1 (Williams, § 771.1); Acts 1961, ch. 244, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-709; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-7-110. Jail specifications.

The county jail shall be of sufficient size and strength to contain and keep securely the inmates confined therein, and shall contain at least two (2) apartments, one (1) for males and one (1) for females.

The county jail shall be properly heated and ventilated, and have sufficient sewerage to ensure the health and comfort of the inmates.

Code 1858, § 412; Acts 1873, ch. 104, § 1; Shan., § 504; Code 1932, § 756; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-710.

Cross-References. Safe and comfortable prisons, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 32.

5-7-111. Replacement of courthouse or jail — Authorization.

Whenever, in the opinion of a majority of the members of the county legislative body, two thirds (2/3) of them being present, the site of a jail or public prison, or courthouse, is unhealthy, insecure or inconvenient in its location to the county or to the town, or inhabitants of the town, in which it is situated, or the interest and convenience of the town would be promoted by the removal of any of the same, the members may order a sale of the site, and of the whole or part of the materials used in its construction; and they may also order that a more eligible, convenient, healthy or secure site be purchased, and cause to be erected thereon a new jail or courthouse, better suited to the convenience of the town, and to secure the safe custody, health and comfort of inmates.

Code 1858, § 414 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 34, § 1; 1837-1838, ch. 11, § 1); Shan., § 506; Code 1932, § 758; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-711.

Cross-References. Sale of courthouse on removal of county seat, § 5-4-105.

5-7-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-7-112 (Code 1858, § 415 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 34, § 3); Shan., § 507; Code 1932, § 759; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 12, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-712), concerning the appointment and duties of project superintendents, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 690, § 1, effective July 1, 2002.

5-7-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-7-113 (Code 1858, § 416 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 34, § 5); Shan., § 508; Code 1932, § 760; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-713), concerning the project superintendent's oath, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 690, § 2, effective July 1, 2002.

5-7-114. Replacement of courthouse or jail — Deed conveying old site.

Any deed of conveyance of the old site of the prison or courthouse, made by the project superintendents, duly proved or acknowledged and registered, shall be effectual to vest a valid title in the purchaser.

Code 1858, § 417 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 34, § 4); Shan., § 509; Code 1932, § 761; Acts 1979, ch. 12, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-714.

5-7-115. Authority for county governments to display historic documents on public buildings and grounds.

Each county is authorized to display, in county public buildings and on county public grounds, replicas of historical documents, including, but not limited to, the Ten Commandments, Magna Carta, Mayflower Compact, Declaration of Independence, United States Constitution, Bill of Rights, Constitution of Tennessee, and other such historically significant documents in the form of statues, monuments, memorials, tablets, or any other display that respects the dignity and solemnity of such documents.

Acts 2012, ch. 686, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-7-115 (Acts 1951, ch. 137, § 4; 1953, ch. 218, § 1 (Williams, § 4406.53d); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-715), concerning industrial buildings, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 1.

For the preamble to the act authorizing local governments to display historic documents, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 686.

Cross-References. Authority for municipalities to display historic documents on buildings and grounds, § 6-54-110.

5-7-116. Leasing.

Each county may lease land or existing buildings owned by the county to any person, corporation, partnership or association for such consideration and upon such terms as in the judgment of the governing body are in the interest of the county.

Acts 1983, ch. 233, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County’s authority to impose ticket surcharge at county agricultural center. OAG 14-43, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/7/14).

5-7-117. County operating water utility system — Transfer of system to utility district — Procedure.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any county operating a water utility system pursuant to previous transfer or merger under the authority of title 7, chapter 82, or operating under private acts, or otherwise, may by resolution agree to transfer all or any part of such water system to a utility district having all or part of its official territory within the county, which utility district was either previously formed or formed for the purpose of receiving transfer of such system; provided, that the resolution must contain a provision requiring the protection of all rights of bondholders, and must specifically state all other conditions to the transfer that may be imposed by the county legislative body, and such resolution must be approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of such county legislative body.

Before voting to sell, transfer, convey or set over such system, the county legislative body shall cause notices to be mailed to all customers of such county water system or the part thereof intended to be transferred, and shall provide such customers an opportunity to testify in a public hearing, the date of which shall be fixed in such notice.

When all conditions of such resolution shall have been met, the county mayor and president of the utility district shall sign an addendum to the contract, identifying the county and the utility district resolutions of which the contract consists, certifying that all conditions therein have been met, and shall cause such addendum to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county at the expense of the utility district, upon which publication the transfer shall thereupon be consummated by operation of law without the need for the execution of any instruments of transfer.

Acts 1991, ch. 228, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Agreement by utility district to transfer of water utility system from county, § 7-82-109.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-7-118. County security officers — Standards — Police powers.

The county mayor or the county mayor's designee is authorized to establish policies pursuant to which a suitable number of persons may be employed and commissioned as county security officers.

All security officers employed pursuant to this section must meet the minimum certification requirements of the peace officers standards and training commission.

The county mayor or the county mayor's designee is authorized to establish such other minimum qualifications for employment as security officers as deemed appropriate; however, the qualifications for security officers permitted to carry firearms or other arms while on duty shall be at least equivalent to the certification requirements of the peace officers standards and training commission.

When properly commissioned and qualified in accordance with the policies of the county mayor or the county mayor's designee, the security officers shall have all the police powers necessary to enforce all state laws and duly enacted county ordinances. The authority hereby granted extends to all facilities or property owned, leased or operated by the county.

This section only applies in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1996, ch. 716, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. County security officers employed as campus, housing, airport and other local security officers, are required to be certified under T.C.A. § 5-7-118, OAG 03-095, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (7/28/03).

5-7-119. County authorized to dispose of real property at nominal cost to certain nonprofit corporations.

Notwithstanding any rule, regulation or other law to the contrary, any county, upon two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body, may dispose of real property at a nominal cost by private negotiation and sale to a nonprofit corporation, incorporated under the laws of this state, that has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), and whose purpose includes providing educational and vocational training services to children and adults with disabilities or whose purpose includes providing educational services to youth in areas, including health, science, agriculture, and civic engagement through in-school and after-school programs, and school and community clubs and camps.

Acts 2014, ch. 635, § 1; 2020, ch. 721, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “or whose purpose includes providing educational services to youth in areas, including health, science, agriculture, and civic engagement through in-school and after-school programs, and school and community clubs and camps.” at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 721, § 2. June 22, 2020.